Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 5

Bond Anticipation Notes

9-21-501. Authorization for the issuance of bond anticipation notes.

The governing body of the local government acting by resolution is hereby authorized to issue and sell interest-bearing bond anticipation notes for all purposes for which bonds can be legally authorized and issued by a local government for public works projects as defined by this chapter, and for purposes authorized by chapter 11 of this title and by title 49, chapter 3, part 10. Such resolution shall not be effective until the initial resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, if required, shall have been adopted, published and no petition protesting the issuance of such bonds shall have been filed as permitted by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 5-1; 1987, ch. 77, § 6.

9-21-502. Purchase and terms of bond anticipation notes.

Bond anticipation notes shall be sold for not less than ninety-nine percent (99%) of the par value thereof and accrued interest as the governing body of the local government may direct. Bond anticipation notes may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, may be subject to such terms of redemption, without a premium or, for notes sold for not less than the par value thereof and accrued interest, without or with a premium of not exceeding one percent (1%) of the principal amount thereof, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 5-2.

9-21-503. Method of sale of bond anticipation notes.

Bond anticipation notes may be sold in such manner either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 5-3.

9-21-504. Security for bond anticipation notes.

Bond anticipation notes issued in anticipation of bonds secured by the full faith and credit of the local government shall be secured by a pledge of the taxing power of the local government, as to all taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, which shall be subject to taxation for the payment of the bonds, the issuance of which is anticipated by such notes, and may, at the option of the local government, be additionally secured by the same revenues which will secure the bonds, the issuance of which is anticipated by such notes and identified in the initial resolution authorizing such bonds. When the bond anticipation notes are so issued and sold, they shall be direct obligations of the local government, the payment of which shall be made according to the tenor and effect thereof. The governing body of the local government is hereby authorized to levy and provide for the collection of a special tax over and above all other taxes authorized or limited by law to be imposed and levied on all the taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, to create a sinking fund to retire the notes with interest as they fall due.

Bond anticipation notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds secured by and payable solely from revenues of a public works project may be secured by the revenues from the public works project.

When bonds shall have been issued and sold for a public works project, a sufficient amount of the proceeds shall be applied to the payment at their maturity or redemption of any bond anticipation notes issued for such public works project then outstanding. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the retirement of bond anticipation notes from other local government funds available and authorized for such purpose.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 5-4.

9-21-505. Approval of bond anticipation notes and application for their extension or renewal.

The sale of bond anticipation notes shall first be approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and the notes shall be issued for the express purpose of providing funds in anticipation of the sale of bonds. All such notes shall be issued for a period not to exceed two (2) years from the date of issue; provided, that with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee the notes may be extended or renewed for not more than two (2) additional periods not exceeding two (2) years each. Each year that extension or renewal notes are outstanding, the local government shall retire a portion thereof equal to not less than one-twentieth (1/20) of the original principal amount of the notes, and to that end, the resolution authorizing any such issue of extension or renewal notes shall provide for the notes to mature serially, and may provide that the notes shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at the option of the local government. In approving any issue of extension or renewal notes, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may waive the requirement of periodic retirement. Application to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for the extension or renewal of any such notes shall be by resolution of the governing body. Notwithstanding this section, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall not be required to approve the issuance or extension of any bond anticipation note issued in anticipation of the issuance of a bond or other debt obligation to a state or federal agency.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 5-5; 1987, ch. 77, § 7; 2005, ch. 393, § 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 51.